North Dakota, session 69, HB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Gold and silver investments .
1. Notwithstanding section 6 - 09 - 07, the state treasurer shall invest at least one percen t
of all funds that are deposited in the state treasury and invested by the state treasurer
in gold and silver.
2. Gold and silver investments by the state treasurer under this section must be held
directly by the state treasurer as bullion or coins in a secure facility or on behalf of the
state through a qualified custodian, exchange traded product, or other investment
instrument.
3. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the state treasurer may contract for
services to assist with the investments in gold and silver under this section.
4. The state treasurer shall develop policies and procedures for managing gold and silver
investments.
SECTION 2. GOLD AND SILVER INVESTMENTS STUDY - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT. During the 2025-26 interim, the state treasurer shall study the costs and
benefits of investing state funds in gold and silver. The study must include consideration of the
Page No. 1 25.0801.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
effects of inflation and economic stability for the state. The state treasurer shall report its
findings and recommendations to the legislative management by June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this Act becomes effective July 1, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.0801.02000